Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Standards of Conduct.
Sec. 24.60.080.
Gifts.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a legislator or legislative employee may not

solicit, accept, or receive, directly or indirectly, a gift worth $250 or more, whether in the form of money, services, a loan, travel, entertainment, hospitality, promise, or other form, or gifts from the same person worth less than $250 that in a calendar year aggregate to $250 or more in value;

solicit, accept, or receive a gift with any monetary value from a lobbyist, an immediate family member of a lobbyist, or a person acting on behalf of a lobbyist, except

food or nonalcoholic beverage for immediate consumption

with a value of $15 or less; or

provided as part of an event that is open to all legislators or legislative employees;

a contribution to a charity event, tickets to a charity event, and gifts to which the tickets may entitle the bearer; however, under this subparagraph a legislator or legislative employee may not solicit, accept, or receive from the same lobbyist, an immediate family member of the lobbyist, or a person acting on behalf of the lobbyist, tickets to a charity event, gifts to which the tickets may entitle the bearer, or both, that in a calendar year aggregate to $250 or more in value; in this subparagraph, “charity event” means an event the proceeds of which go to a charitable organization with tax- free status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) and that the Alaska legislative council has approved in advance; the tickets may entitle the bearer to admission to the event, to entertainment, to food or beverages, or to other gifts or services in connection with the charity event;

a gift that is unconnected with the recipient’s legislative status and is from a member of the legislator’s or legislative employee’s immediate family;

a gift delivered on the premises of a state facility and accepted on behalf of a recognized nonpolitical charitable organization; or

a compassionate gift under AS

24.60.075

.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

Notwithstanding (a)(1) of this section, it is not a violation of this section for a person who is a legislator or legislative employee to accept

hospitality, other than hospitality described in (4) of this subsection,

with incidental transportation at the residence of a person; however, a vacation home located outside the state is not considered a residence for the purposes of this subparagraph; or

at a social event or meal;

discounts that are available

generally to the public or to a large class of persons to which the person belongs; or

when on official state business, but only if receipt of the discount benefits the state;

food or foodstuffs indigenous to the state that are shared generally as a cultural or social norm;

travel and hospitality primarily for the purpose of obtaining information on matters of legislative concern;

gifts from the immediate family of the person; in this paragraph, “immediate family” means

the spouse of the person;

the person’s domestic partner;

a child, including a stepchild and an adopted child, of the person or of the person’s domestic partner;

a parent, sibling, grandparent, aunt, or uncle of the person;

a parent, sibling, grandparent, aunt, or uncle of the person’s spouse or the person’s domestic partner; and

a stepparent, stepsister, stepbrother, step-grandparent, step-aunt, or step-uncle of the person, the person’s spouse, or the person’s domestic partner;

gifts that are not connected with the recipient’s legislative status;

a discount for all or part of a legislative session, including time immediately preceding or following the session, or other gift to welcome a legislator or legislative employee who is employed on the personal staff of a legislator or by a standing or special committee to the capital city or in recognition of the beginning of a legislative session if the gift or discount is available generally to all legislators and the personal staff of legislators and staff of standing and special committees; this paragraph does not apply to legislative employees who are employed by the Legislative Affairs Agency, the office of the chief clerk, the office of the senate secretary, the legislative budget and audit committee, the office of victims’ rights, or the office of the ombudsman;

a gift of legal services in a matter of legislative concern and a gift of other services related to the provision of legal services in a matter of legislative concern;

a gift of transportation from a legislator or a legislative employee to a legislator or a legislative employee if the transportation takes place in the state on or in an aircraft, boat, motor vehicle, or other means of transport owned or under the control of the donor; this paragraph does not apply to travel described in (4) of this subsection or travel for political campaign purposes; or

a contribution to a charity event, a ticket to a charity event, or a gift in connection with a charity event; in this paragraph, “charity event” has the meaning given in (a)(2)(B) of this section.

A legislator or legislative employee who accepts a gift under (c)(4) of this section that has a value of $250 or more or a ticket to a charity event or gift in connection with a charity event under (c)(10) of this section that has a value of $250 or more shall disclose to the committee, within 60 days after receipt of the gift, the name and occupation of the donor and the approximate value of the gift. A legislator or legislative employee who accepts a gift under (c)(8) of this section that the recipient expects will have a value of $250 or more in the calendar year shall disclose to the committee, within 30 days after receipt of the gift, the name and occupation of the donor, a general description of the matter of legislative concern with respect to which the gift is made, and the approximate value of the gift. The committee shall maintain a public record of the disclosures it receives relating to gifts under (c)(4), (c)(8), (c)(10), and (i) of this section and shall forward the disclosures to the appropriate house for inclusion in the journal. The committee shall forward to the Alaska Public Offices Commission copies of the disclosures concerning gifts under (c)(4), (c)(8), (c)(10), and (i) of this section that it receives from legislators and legislative directors. A legislator or legislative employee who accepts a gift under (c)(6) of this section that has a value of $250 or more shall, within 30 days after receiving the gift, disclose to the committee the name and occupation of the donor and a description of the gift. The committee shall maintain disclosures relating to gifts under (c)(6) of this section as confidential records and may only use, or permit a committee employee or contractor to use, a disclosure under (c)(6) of this section in the investigation of a possible violation of this section or in a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

. If the disclosure under (c)(6) of this section becomes part of the record of a proceeding under AS

24.60.170

, the confidentiality provisions of that section apply to the disclosure.

A political contribution is not a gift under this section if it is reported under AS

15.13.040

or is exempt from the reporting requirement under AS

15.13.040(g)

. The use of a bulk mailing permit owned by a legislator’s campaign committee or used in a legislator’s election campaign is not a gift to that legislator under this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a legislator or legislative employee may accept a gift of property worth $250 or more, other than money, from another government or from an official of another government if the person accepts the gift on behalf of the legislature. The person shall, within 60 days after receiving the gift, deliver the gift to the legislative council, which shall determine the appropriate disposition of the gift. In this subsection, “another government” means a foreign government or the government of the United States, another state, a municipality, or another jurisdiction.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a legislator or legislative employee may solicit, accept, or receive a gift on behalf of a recognized, nonpolitical charitable organization.

A legislator, a legislative committee other than the Select Committee on Legislative Ethics, or a legislative agency may accept a gift of (1) volunteer services for legislative purposes so long as the person making the gift of services is not receiving compensation from another source for the services, or (2) the services of a legislative intern who is participating in an educational program approved by the committee if the services are used for legislative purposes. The committee shall approve training under a program of the University of Alaska and training under 29 U.S.C. 2801 — 2945 (Workforce Investment Act of 1998).

A legislator or legislative employee who knows or reasonably should know that an immediate family member has received a gift because of the family member’s connection with the legislator or legislative employee shall disclose for publication under (d) of this section the receipt of the gift by the family member to the committee if the gift would have to be disclosed under this section if it had been received by the legislator or legislative employee. If receipt of the gift by a person who is a legislator or legislative employee would be prohibited under this section, a member of the person’s immediate family may not receive the gift.

In this section, the value of a gift shall be determined by the fair market value of the gift to the extent that the fair market value can be determined.

[Repealed, § 74 ch 47 SLA 2007.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 167 SLA 1988; am §§ 10 — 13, 42 ch 127 SLA 1992; am §§ 27 — 33 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 3 SLA 2002; am § 42 ch 86 SLA 2002; am § 28 ch 108 SLA 2003; am § 6 ch 115 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 10 SLA 2006; am §§ 27 — 30, 74 ch 47 SLA 2007; am §§ 2, 3 ch 94 SLA 2008; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 45 SLA 2012; am § 12 ch 9 SLA 2014; am § 10 ch 61 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (g) — (j) were enacted as (h) — (k).
Relettered in 1998, at which time former subsection (g) was relettered as (k).

Cross references. —

The Workforce Investment Act of 1998,
29 U.S.C. 2801 — 2945, referenced in subsection (h), was repealed and replaced in 2014 by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act,
29 U.S.C. 3101 et seq.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective April 23, 2014, in (c)(5)(C), substituted “an adopted child” for “an adoptive child”.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 20, 2018, in the introductory language of (a)(2)(A), inserted “nonalcoholic” following “food or”, added (a)(2)(A)(i) and (ii). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 17, ch. 61, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 19, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 20, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

For provision relating to the severability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 15, ch. 61, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 24.60.085.
Restrictions on earned income and honoraria.

A legislator or legislative employee may not

seek or accept compensation for personal services that is significantly greater than the value of the services rendered taking into account the higher rates generally charged by specialists in a profession; or

accept a payment of anything of value, except for actual and necessarily incurred travel expenses, for an appearance or speech by the legislator or legislative employee; this paragraph does not apply to the salary paid to a legislator or legislative employee for making an appearance or speech as part of the legislator’s or legislative employee’s normal course of employment.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a legislator or legislative employee may accept a payment for an appearance or speech if the appearance or speech is not connected with the person’s legislative status.

During the term for which elected or appointed, a legislator may not, directly or by authorizing another to act on the legislator’s behalf, accept or agree to accept compensation, except from the State of Alaska, for work associated with legislative action, administrative action, or political action. Notwithstanding AS

24.60.990

, in this subsection, “administrative action” and “legislative action” have the meanings given in AS

24.45.171

.

History.

(§ 14 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 34 ch 74 SLA 1998; am § 31 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 24.60.090.
Nepotism.

An individual who is related to a member of the legislature may not be employed for compensation (1) during the legislative session in the house in which the legislator is a member, (2) by an agency of the legislature established under AS 24.20, (3) in either house during the interim between sessions, or (4), whether for compensation or not, by the committee. An individual who is related to a legislative employee may not be employed in a position over which the employee has supervisory authority. In this subsection, “an individual who is related to” means a member of the legislator’s or legislative employee’s immediate family or a person who is a legislator’s or legislative employee’s domestic partner living together in a conjugal relationship not a legal marriage with the legislator or legislative employee, and “interim between sessions” means the period beginning on the eighth day after the legislature adjourns from a regular session, and ending eight days before the date that the legislature shall convene under AS

24.05.090

.

[Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

[Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am §§ 15, 42 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 29 ch 108 SLA 2003)

Sec. 24.60.100.
Representation.

A legislator or legislative employee who represents another person for compensation before an agency, board, or commission of the state shall disclose the name of the person represented, the subject matter of the representation, and the body before which the representation is to take place to the committee. The disclosure shall be made by the deadlines set out in AS

24.60.105

. The committee shall maintain a public record of a disclosure under this section and forward the disclosure to the respective house for inclusion in the journal. A legislator or legislative employee may not represent another person for compensation before an agency, committee, or other entity of the legislative branch.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 113 SLA 1986; am § 16 ch 127 SLA 1992; am § 35 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Sec. 24.60.105.
Deadlines for filing disclosures; requests to refrain from disclosure.

When a legislator or legislative employee is required to file a disclosure under this chapter and a date by which the disclosure must be filed is not otherwise set by statute, the deadline for filing the disclosure shall be 30 days after the commencement of the matter or interest or the date the legislator or legislative employee first becomes subject to this chapter, whichever comes later.

Disclosures under the following statutes are subject to the deadlines set out in this section:

service on the board of an organization as set out in AS

24.60.030(f)

;

an interest in a state contract or lease under AS

24.60.040

and the renegotiation of the terms of a state contract or lease that materially affect the obligations of either party;

participation in a state program or receipt of a state loan under AS

24.60.050

and the renegotiation of the terms of the program or loan if the renegotiation materially affects the obligations of either party;

formation or maintenance of a close economic association under AS

24.60.070

;

representation of a client under AS

24.60.100

.

In addition to the filing requirements under (a) and (b) of this section, the disclosures under (b) of this section shall be made annually, in a report filed with the committee within 30 days after the first day of the regular legislative session.

A person may submit a written request to refrain from making a disclosure that is required by this chapter if making the disclosure would violate state or federal law, including the United States Constitution and the Constitution of the State of Alaska, or a rule, adopted formally by a trade or profession, that state or federal law requires the person to follow. The committee shall approve or deny the request, or require further justification from the person making the request. At the request of the committee or a person authorized to act on behalf of the committee, a person who seeks to refrain from making a disclosure under this subsection shall provide the committee with justification in writing, and the committee may review the written justification to determine whether it is sufficient.

History.

(§ 36 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 32, 33 ch 47 SLA 2007; am § 10 ch 45 SLA 2012)

Sec. 24.60.110.
Action on a conflict of interest. [Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 24.60.112.
Applicability to legislative interns, volunteers, consultants, and independent contractors.

A legislative intern or legislative volunteer shall comply with AS

24.60.030

-

24.60.039

,

24.60.060

,

24.60.080

,

24.60.085

, and

24.60.155

, and the committee shall apply AS

24.60.158

-

24.60.170

,

24.60.176

, and

24.60.178

to a legislative intern or legislative volunteer.

A legislative consultant or legislative independent contractor shall comply with AS

24.60.030(a)(1)

and (3),

24.60.031(a)

,

24.60.033

,

24.60.060

, and

24.60.080(a)

, (c)(1) - (6), (g), and (j), and the committee shall apply AS

24.60.158

-

24.60.170

,

24.60.176

, and

24.60.178

to a legislative consultant or legislative independent contractor.

If a person believes that a legislative intern, legislative volunteer, legislative consultant, or legislative independent contractor has violated a provision of this chapter that is made applicable by this section, the person may file a complaint under AS

24.60.170

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 94 SLA 2008; am § 11 ch 45 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as
AS

24.60.080

(

l

) and renumbered in 2008, at which time “this section” was deleted and “24.60.080” was added.
However, before its enactment as
AS

24.60.080

(

l

), the language of this section was part of
AS

24.60.080(h)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, rewrote the section.

Sec. 24.60.115.
Disclosure required of a legislator, legislative employee, or public member of the committee after final day of service.

A person serving as a legislator, legislative employee, or public member of the committee shall, not later than 90 days after the person’s final day of service as a legislator, legislative employee, or public member, file a final disclosure of every matter or interest, except for a matter or interest subject to disclosure under AS

24.60.200

, that was subject to disclosure under this chapter while the person was serving, unless the person previously disclosed the matter or interest and, for that reason, the matter or interest is no longer subject to disclosure. Nothing in this section excuses the filing of a disclosure or report as may be required by another section of this chapter.

History.

(§ 34 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 24.60.120.
State property and funds. [Repealed, § 42 ch 127 SLA 1992.]